Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2177.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3301.2(a) and (b) heading of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, amended March 8, 2024 (P.L.2, No.2), are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3301.2. Publication.(a) Requirements.--Except as provided under this part or other law, council shall publish every proposed ordinance once in one newspaper of general circulation no less than seven days and no more than 60 days prior to the day when council shall vote on the proposed ordinance. Publication of any proposed ordinance shall include all of the following:[(1) The full text or the title of the ordinance and a 1234567891011121314151617181920 brief summary prepared by the borough solicitor setting forth all the provisions in reasonable detail.](1) The full text of the proposed ordinance or the title and a brief summary of the proposed ordinance. The brief summary shall include a description of each of the following, as applicable:(i) An adoption, amendment or repeal of a tax, fee, charge or assessment.(ii) An adoption, amendment or repeal of a regulation that provides for an offense or civil or criminal penalty.(iii) A provision or covenant that does one or more of the following:(A) Provides for the payment or disbursement of funds for goods, services or contractual obligations.(B) Restricts funds to a specific purpose or obligation.(C) Pledges funds for a specific purpose or obligation.(2) A reference to the borough office or other place where [borough records are kept where] copies of the proposed ordinance may be examined.(3) A reference to the publicly accessible Internet website, if any, where the full text of the proposed ordinance may be examined.(a.1) Legal sufficiency.--If a published summary is subject to a legal challenge, a summary shall be legally sufficient if the summary containing the information required under subsection (a)(1) is made available for examination at the time of publication in conformity with subsection (a)(2) and (3).20260HB2177PN2832 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a.2) Land use ordinances.--Notwithstanding subsection (a)(1), the requirements of this section shall not supersede the publication or notification requirements of a proposed ordinance under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code.(b) [Summary] Full text availability.--If the full text is not included in the publication of the proposed ordinance, the following shall apply:* * *Section 2. Section 11018.9(b)(1) of Title 11 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 11018.9. Publication of proposed ordinances.* * *(b) Contents.--(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, the publication of a proposed ordinance shall include [either:(i) the full text; or(ii) the title and a summary of the ordinance setting forth the provisions in reasonable detail and a reference to a place within the city where copies of the proposed ordinance may be examined.] all of the following:(i) The full text of the proposed ordinance or the title and a brief summary of the proposed ordinance. The brief summary shall include a description of each of the following, as applicable:(A) An adoption, amendment or repeal of a tax, fee, charge or assessment.(B) An adoption, amendment or repeal of a regulation that provides for an offense or civil or 20260HB2177PN2832 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 criminal penalty.(C) A provision or covenant that does one or more of the following:(I) Provides for the payment or disbursement of funds for goods, services or contractual obligations.(II) Restricts funds to a specific purpose or obligation.(III) Pledges funds for a specific purpose or obligation.(ii) A reference to the city office or other place where copies of the proposed ordinance may be examined.(iii) A reference to the publicly accessible Internet website, if any, where the full text of the proposed ordinances may be examined.* * *(b.1) Legal sufficiency.--If a published summary is subject to a legal challenge, a summary shall be legally sufficient if the summary containing the information required under subsection (b)(1)(i) is made available for examination at the time of publication in conformity with subsection (b)(1)(ii) and (iii).(b.2) Land use ordinances.--Notwithstanding subsection (b)(1)(i), the requirements of this section shall not supersede the publication or notification requirements of a proposed ordinance under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code.* * *Section 3. Section 12509(b)(2) of Title 16, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:20260HB2177PN2832 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 12509. Ordinances and resolutions.* * *(b) Publication.--* * *(2) A public notice of a proposed ordinance shall include [the full text of the proposed ordinance or the title and a brief summary of the proposed ordinance prepared by the county solicitor setting forth all the provisions in reasonable detail and a reference to a location within the county in which copies of the proposed ordinance may be examined.] all of the following:(i) The full text of the proposed ordinance or the title and a brief summary of the proposed ordinance. The brief summary shall include a description of each of the following, as applicable:(A) An adoption, amendment or repeal of a tax, fee, charge or assessment.(B) An adoption, amendment or repeal of a regulation that provides for an offense or civil or criminal penalty.(C) A provision or covenant that does one or more of the following:(I) Provides for the payment or disbursement of funds for goods, services or contractual obligations.(II) Restricts funds to a specific purpose or obligation.(III) Pledges funds for a specific purpose or obligation.(ii) A reference to the county office or other place 20260HB2177PN2832 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 where copies of the proposed ordinance may be examined.(iii) A reference to the publicly accessible Internet website, if any, where the full text of the proposed ordinances may be examined.* * *(b.1) Legal sufficiency.--If a published summary is subject to a legal challenge, a summary shall be legally sufficient if the summary containing the information required under subsection (b)(2)(i) is made available for examination at the time of publication in conformity with subsection (b)(2)(ii) and (iii).(b.2) Land use ordinances.--Notwithstanding subsection (b)(2)(i), the requirements of this section shall not supersede the publication or notification requirements of a proposed ordinance under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code.* * *Section 4. The publication requirements under this act shall apply to any provision of an ordinance that is advertised on or after the effective date of this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2177PN2832 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617181920